District of Columbia statutes.
42-1901.07

Variation by agreement.

Except as expressly provided by this chapter, a provision of this chapter may not be varied by agreement and any right conferred by this chapter may not be waived. A declarant may not act under a power of attorney or use any other device to evade a limitation or prohibition of this chapter or the condominium instruments.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title I, § 107
as added Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-233, § 2(f), 38 DCR 261
Mar. 20, 1992, D.C. Law 9-82, § 2(c), 39 DCR 683
1981 Ed., § 45-1807.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of Condominium Act of 1976 Technical and Clarifying Temporary Amendment Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-38, August 17, 1991, law notification 38 DCR 5805).